California, session 20252026, AB1843.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1342.76 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:1342.76. (a) (1) A health care service plan shall not subject direct-acting antiviral drugs that are medically necessary for the treatment of hepatitis C, including, but not limited to, sofosbuvir/velpatasvir, sofosbuvir/ledipasvir, glecaprevir/pibrentasvir, or elbasvir/grazoprevir, C to prior authorization, except as provided in paragraph (2).(2) If the United States Food and Drug Administration has approved one or more therapeutic equivalents of a pangenotypic drug, device, or product for the treatment of hepatitis C, this section does not require a health care service plan to cover all of the therapeutically equivalent versions without prior authorization, if at least one pangenotypic and therapeutically equivalent version is covered without prior authorization.(b) A health care service plan’s clinical criteria for hepatitis C treatment and prior authorization shall align with the current guidelines and the standard of care consistent with the standards of the American Association for the Study of Liver Diseases and the Infectious Diseases Society of America, and shall not impose prior authorization requirements, including, but not limited to, all of the following: Diseases and the Infectious Diseases Society of America or generally accepted clinical practice guidelines of another nonprofit health care provider professional association or specialty society pertaining to clinical hepatology or infectious disease. A plan shall not request, for the purpose of determining prior authorization for hepatitis C treatment, any of the following:(1) A liver biopsy.(2) Genotype testing.(3) Sobriety requirements. Proof of sobriety.(4) Fibrosis staging thresholds.(5) Elastography or FibroScan documentation. Documentation of elastography or other measures of liver stiffness.(6) Ultrasound documentation.(7) A specialist referral or evaluation.SEC. 2. Section 10123.1936 is added to the Insurance Code, to read:10123.1936. (a) (1) A health insurer shall not subject direct-acting antiviral drugs that are medically necessary for the treatment of hepatitis C, including, but not limited to, sofosbuvir/velpatasvir, sofosbuvir/ledipasvir, glecaprevir/pibrentasvir, or elbasvir/grazoprevir, C to prior authorization, except as provided in paragraph (2).(2) If the United States Food and Drug Administration has approved one or more therapeutic equivalents of a pangenotypic drug, device, or product for the treatment of hepatitis C, this section does not require a health insurer to cover all of the therapeutically equivalent versions without prior authorization, if at least one pangenotypic and therapeutically equivalent version is covered without prior authorization.(b) A health insurer’s clinical criteria for hepatitis C treatment and prior authorization shall align with the current guidelines and the standard of care consistent with the standards of the American Association for the Study of Liver Diseases and the Infectious Diseases Society of America, and shall not impose prior authorization requirements, including, but not limited to, all of the following: Diseases and the Infectious Diseases Society of America or generally accepted clinical practice guidelines of another nonprofit health care provider professional association or specialty society pertaining to clinical hepatology or infectious disease. An insurer shall not request, for the purpose of determining prior authorization for hepatitis C treatment, any of the following:(1) A liver biopsy.(2) Genotype testing.(3) Sobriety requirements. Proof of sobriety.(4) Fibrosis staging thresholds.(5) Elastography or FibroScan documentation. Documentation of elastography or other measures of liver stiffness.(6) Ultrasound documentation.(7) A specialist referral or evaluation.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.